Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 4 Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures; Public Records, Documentsand Meetings

Legislative intent in requiring publication of minutes of townmeetings. —

The intent of the legislature in enacting §

15-1-110

, which requires the minutes of town meetings to be published, was to insure that the business of each municipality in Wyoming would be subject to public scrutiny with respect to the expenditure of funds for all acquired debts. Record-Times, Inc. v. Wheatland, 650 P.2d 297,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 381

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What are matters “related solely to the internal personnel rules and practices of an agency” exempted from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act (5 USCS § 552(b)(2)), 141 ALR Fed 531.